Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB529.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 439.320 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Governor shall appoint a Parole Board consisting of nine (9) full-time members to be confirmed by
the Senate in accordance with KRS 11.160.
(b) The Governor shall make each appointment from a list of three (3) names given to him or her by the
Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(c) Each member appointed to the board shall have had at least five (5) years of actual experience in the
field of penology, correction work, law enforcement, sociology, law, education, social work, medicine,
or a combination of those fields[thereof], or have served at least five (5) years previously on the Parole
Board.
(d) No more than six (6) board members shall be of the same political party.
(e) The board shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for administrative purposes only.
The department[ of Corrections] shall provide any clerical, stenographic, administrative, and expert
staff assistance the board deems necessary to carry out its duties.
(2) The Governor shall designate one (1) member as chairperson of the board. The member designated as
chairperson shall serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the Governor or until his or her term expires.
(3) (a) The members of the board shall give full time to the duties of their office and shall receive necessary
traveling expenses and a salary to be determined pursuant to KRS 64.640(2), except the chairperson of
the board shall receive additional compensation of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per year for his or her
services.
(b) The members of the board shall serve for staggered terms of four (4) years and until their successors
are appointed and have qualified, so that no more than three (3) terms shall expire in a given
year[The members of the board shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor, but for no more than four
(4) years without reappointment]. Their successors shall then be appointed[ thereafter] as provided in
this section. A vacancy occurring before expiration of the term of office shall be similarly filled for the
unexpired term.
(4) The organization of the board shall be determined by the chairperson and shall be consistent with
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS 439.340. For policy and procedural matters, five (5)
members shall constitute a quorum.
(5) Parole and final parole revocation hearings may be done by panels of the board, subject to the following
requirements:
(a) If a two (2) member panel is utilized, both members of the panel shall agree on a decision;[A panel
shall consist of not less than three (3) and not more than six (6) members; and]
(b) If a three (3) member panel is utilized, two (2) of the three (3) members of the panel shall agree on a
decision; and
(c) If a panel of four (4) or more members is utilized, a majority of the panel shall agree on a decision;
In all cases in which the required number of panel members are not in agreement on a decision,[All
members of the panel shall agree on a decision or] the matter shall be referred to the full board.
(6) The Governor may not remove any member of the board except for disability, inefficiency, neglect of duty, or
malfeasance in office. Before removal, the Governor[he or she] shall give the member a written copy of the
charges against him or her and shall fix the time when he or she can be heard in his or her defense, which shall
not be less than ten (10) days after receiving the written copy of the charges against him or her[thereafter].
Upon removal, the Governor shall file in the office of the Secretary of State a complete statement of all
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
charges made against the member and the findings upon the charges[thereupon] with a record of the
proceedings.
Section 2. KRS 439.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may release on parole persons confined in any adult state penal or correctional institution of
Kentucky or sentenced felons incarcerated in county jails eligible for parole. All paroles shall issue upon order
of the board duly adopted. As soon as practicable after his or her admission to an adult state penal or
correctional institution or county jail if he or she is a sentenced felon, and at such intervals thereafter as it may
determine, the department[ of Corrections] shall obtain all pertinent information regarding each prisoner,
except those not eligible for parole. The information shall include the results of his or her most recent risk and
needs assessment, his or her criminal record, his or her conduct, employment, and the reports of physical and
mental examinations that have been made. The department[ of Corrections] shall furnish the circumstances of
his or her offense, the results of his or her most recent risk and needs assessment, and his or her previous social
history to the board. The department[ of Corrections] shall prepare a report on any information it obtains,[. It
shall be the duty of the Department of Corrections to] supplement this report with any material the board may
request, and submit the report to the board.
(2) (a) Before granting the parole of any prisoner, the board shall consider the pertinent information regarding
the prisoner, including the results of his or her most recent risk and needs assessment, and shall have
him or her appear before it for interview and hearing. The board in its discretion may hold interviews
and hearings for prisoners convicted of Class C felonies not included within the definition of "violent
offender" in KRS 439.3401 and Class D felonies not included within the definition of "sex crime" in
KRS 17.500. The board in its discretion may request the parole board of another state confining
prisoners pursuant to KRS 196.610 to interview eligible prisoners and make a parole recommendation
to the board. A parole shall be ordered only for the best interest of society and not as an award of
clemency, and it shall not be considered a reduction of sentence or pardon. A prisoner shall be placed
on parole only when arrangements have been made for his or her proper employment or for his or her
maintenance and care, and when the board believes he or she is able and willing to fulfill the obligations
of a law-abiding[law abiding] citizen.
(b) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, including KRS 440.330, when a prisoner is otherwise
eligible for parole and the board has recommended parole for that prisoner for the reasons set forth in
this subsection, the board may grant parole to any prisoner wanted as a fugitive by any other
jurisdiction, and the prisoner shall be released to the detainer from that jurisdiction.[ Such] Parole under
this paragraph shall not constitute a relinquishment of jurisdiction over the prisoner, and the board in
all cases expressly reserves the right to return the prisoner to confinement in a correctional institution of
the Commonwealth if the prisoner violates the terms of his or her parole.
(3) (a) A nonviolent offender convicted of a Class D felony with an aggregate sentence of one (1) to five (5)
years who is confined to a state penal institution or county jail shall have his or her case reviewed by
the[ Parole] board after serving fifteen percent (15%) or two (2) months of the original sentence,
whichever is longer.
(b) Except as provided in this section, the board shall promulgate[adopt] administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A with respect to the eligibility of prisoners for parole, the conduct of
parole and parole revocation hearings and all other matters that come before it, or conditions to be
imposed upon parolees. Administrative regulations governing the eligibility of prisoners for parole shall
be in accordance with professionally accepted ideas of correction and reform and may utilize in part
objective, performance-based criteria and risk and needs assessment information.[; however, nothing
herein contained] This paragraph shall not preclude the board from utilizing its present administrative
regulations in conjunction with other factors involved that would relate to the inmate's needs and the
safety of the public.
(4) The board shall ensure that all sentenced felons who have one hundred eighty (180) or more[longer than
ninety (90)] days remaining to serve in state penal institutions, halfway houses, reentry centers, and county
jails are considered for parole not less than sixty (60) days prior to their parole eligibility date, and the
department[ of Corrections] shall provide the necessary assistance and information to the board in order for it
to conduct timely parole reviews.
(5) (a) In addition to or in conjunction with each hearing conducted under subsection (2) of this section for any
prisoner convicted of a Class A, B, or C felony or a Class D felony included within the definition of
"sex crime" in KRS 17.500 and prior to the granting of a parole to any such prisoner, the[ Parole] board

CHAPTER 46 3
shall conduct a hearing of which the following persons shall receive not less than forty-five (45) nor
more than ninety (90) days' notice: the Commonwealth's attorney who shall notify the sheriff of every
county and the chief of police of every city and county in which the prisoner committed any Class A, B,
or C felony or a Class D felony included within the definition of "sex crime" in KRS 17.500 for which
he or she is imprisoned, and all identified victims of the crimes or the next of kin of any victim who is
deceased.
(b) Notice to the Commonwealth's attorney shall be by mail, fax, or electronic means at the discretion of
the board, and shall be in a manner that ensures receipt at the Commonwealth's attorney's business
office. Notices received by chiefs of police and sheriffs shall be posted in a conspicuous location where
police employed by the department may see it. Notices shall be posted in a manner and at a time that
will allow officers to make comment thereon to the[ Parole] board.
(c) 1. Notice to victims or their next of kin shall be made, for prisoners incarcerated prior to July 15,
1986, by mail, fax, or electronic means at the discretion of the board, and shall be in a manner
that ensures receipt by the Commonwealth's attorney, who shall forward the notice promptly to
the victims or their next of kin at their last known address.
2. For prisoners incarcerated on or after July 15, 1986, notice to the victims or their next of kin
shall be by mail from the[ Parole] board to their last known address as provided by the
Commonwealth's attorney to the[ Parole] board at the time of incarceration of the prisoner.
3. For prisoners incarcerated prior to April 1, 2021, for a Class D felony included within the
definition of "sex crime" in KRS 17.500, notice to the victims or their next of kin shall be in a
manner that ensures receipt by the Commonwealth's attorney, who shall forward the notice
promptly to the victims or their next of kin at their last known address.
4. For prisoners incarcerated on or after April 1, 2021, for a Class D felony included within the
definition of "sex crime" in KRS 17.500, notice to the victims or their next of kin shall be by
mail from the Parole Board to their last known address as provided by the Commonwealth's
attorney to the[ Parole] board at the time of incarceration of the prisoner.
(d) Notice to the victim or the next of kin of subsequent considerations for parole after the initial
consideration shall not be sent if the victim or the next of kin gives notice to the board that he or she no
longer wants to receive the[such] notices. The notice shall include the time, date, and place of the
hearing provided for in this subsection, and the name and address of a person to write if the recipient of
the notice desires to attend the hearing or to submit written comments.
(6) (a) Persons receiving notice as provided for in subsection (5) of this section may submit comments, in
person or in writing, to the board upon all issues relating to the parole of the prisoner. The board shall
read and consider all comments prior to making its parole decision[,] if they are received by the board
not less than seven (7) days before the date for the hearing. The board shall retain all comments in the
prisoner's permanent Parole Board file, and shall consider them in conjunction with any subsequent
parole decisions affecting the prisoner.
(b) In addition to officers listed in subsection (5) of this section, the crime victims or the next of kin of any
victim who is deceased or who is disabled and cannot attend the hearing or the parent or legal guardian
of any victim who is a minor may attend the hearing provided for in subsection (5) of this section and
present oral and written comments upon all issues relating to the parole of the prisoner[,] if they have
advised the board, in writing received by the board not less than seven (7) days prior to the date set for
the hearing, of their intention to attend the hearing. The board shall receive and consider all comments,
shall make a record of them which it shall retain in the prisoner's permanent Parole Board file, and shall
consider them in conjunction with any subsequent parole decision affecting the prisoner.
(c) Persons appearing before the[ Parole] board pursuant to this subsection may elect to make their
presentations outside of the presence of the prisoner.
(7) Victims of Class D felonies not included within the definition of "sex crime" in KRS 17.500 may submit
comments in person or in writing to the board upon all issues relating to the parole of a prisoner.
(8) Any hearing provided for in subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section shall be open to the public unless the
persons having a right to appear before the board as specified in those subsections request closure of hearing
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
for reasons of personal safety, in which event the hearing shall be closed. The time, date, and location of
closed hearings shall not be disclosed to the public.
(9) [Except as specifically set forth in this section, nothing in ]This section shall not[ be deemed to] expand or
abridge any existing rights of persons to contact and communicate with the[ Parole] board or any of its
members, agents, or employees, except as specifically set forth in this section.
(10) The unintentional failure by the[ Parole] board, sheriff, chief of police, or any of its members, agents, or
employees or by a Commonwealth's attorney or any of his or her agents or employees to comply with any of
the provisions of subsections (5), (6), and (8) of this section shall not affect the validity of any parole decision
or give rise to any right or cause of action by the crime victim, the prisoner, or any other person.
(11) An[No] eligible sexual offender within the meaning of KRS 197.400 to 197.440 shall not be granted parole
unless he or she has successfully completed the Sexual Offender Treatment Program.
(12) Any prisoner who is granted parole after completion of the Sexual Offender Treatment Program shall be
required, as a condition of his or her parole, to participate in regular treatment in a mental health program
approved or operated by the department[ of Corrections].
(13) When the board grants parole contingent upon completion of a program, the commissioner, or his or her
designee, shall determine the most appropriate placement in a program operated by the department or a
residential or nonresidential program within the community approved by the department. If the department
releases a parolee to a nonresidential program, the department shall release the parolee only if he or she will
have appropriate community housing pursuant to KRS 439.3408.
(14) If the[ Parole] board does not grant parole to a prisoner, the maximum deferment for a prisoner convicted of a
non-violent, non-sexual Class C or Class D felony shall be twenty-four (24) months. For all other prisoners
who are eligible for parole:
(a) A[No] parole deferment greater than five (5) years shall not be ordered unless approved by a majority
vote of the full board; and
(b) A[No] deferment shall not exceed ten (10) years, except for life sentences.
(15) When an order for parole is issued, it shall recite the conditions of the order[thereof], which may include
requiring the person to participate in a specific evidence-based program designed to reduce violence.
Section 3. Notwithstanding Section 1 of this Act, for one of the Parole Board terms expiring in 2026, the
immediate successor shall serve for a term of two years.
Section 4. Whereas the terms of four members of the Parole Board will expire this year in rapid
succession, and the continuity of operations of the Parole Board must be maintained, an emergency is declared to
exist, and Sections 1 and 3 of this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.